Alabama, session 2026rs, SB331.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 16-40A-5, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§16-40A-5
(a) An individual or group of individuals providing
classroom instruction to students in kindergarten
prekindergarten through the fifth twelfth grade at a public
K-12 preK-12 school shall not engage in classroom discussion
or provide classroom instruction regarding sexual orientation
or gender identity in a manner that is not age appropriate or
developmentally appropriate for students in accordance with
state standards.
(b) No teacher, or other public preK-12 employee, may
display a flag or other insignia relating to or representing
sexual orientation or gender identity in a classroom or on the
property of a public preK-12 school.
(c) No teacher, or other public preK-12 employee, may
intentionally address a student by a pronoun or title that is
inconsistent with the student's biological sex at birth.
(d) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules for
Page 2

(d) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules for
SB331 INTRODUCED
the implementation and enforcement of this section."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on July 1,
2026.
Page 3